Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.080

Unlawful acts—Sale of franchise—Terms of franchise agreement.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell a franchise that is registered or required to be registered under this chapter without first furnishing to the prospective franchisee a copy of the franchisor's current disclosure document, as described in RCW 19.100.040 and 19.100.070, at least fourteen calendar days prior to the execution by the prospective franchisee of any binding franchise or other agreement, or at least fourteen calendar days before the prospective franchisee signs a binding agreement with, or makes any payment to, the franchisor or an affiliate in connection with the proposed franchise sale.

(2) It is unlawful for any franchisor to alter unilaterally and materially the terms and conditions of the basic franchise agreement or any related agreements attached to the disclosure document without furnishing the prospective franchisee with a copy of each revised agreement at least seven calendar days before the prospective franchisee signs the revised agreement. Changes to an agreement that arise out of negotiations initiated by the prospective franchisee do not trigger this seven calendar day period.

[ 2012 c 121 s 6; 1991 c 226 s 6; 1972 ex.s. c 116 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 8.]